Maryland, session 2026, SB0649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
11–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(l) “Weight and measure” means any instrument or device used for weighing or
measuring, and any appliance or accessory associated with any instrument or device used
for weighing or measuring.
11–316.
– 1 –

Ch. 280 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(A) (1) THE OWNER OR POSSESSOR OF A WEIGHT AND MEASURE USED
FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A VEHICLE FUEL SHALL CLEARLY AND
CONSPICUOUSLY DISPLAY INFORMATION DETAILING THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND
PHONE NUMBER OF A LOCAL PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR THE WEIGHT AND
MEASURE.
(2) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE DISPLAYED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE DISPLAYED ON OR IMMEDIATELY ADJACENT TO THE WEIGHT
AND MEASURE.
(B) (1) ALL ELECTRICITY POSSESSED, OFFERED, OR EXPOSED FOR SALE
AND SOLD AT RETAIL AS A VEHICLE FUEL SHALL BE MEASURED AND SOLD IN UNITS
OF KILOWATT–HOURS.
(2) DURING A CHARGING SESSION, A CUSTOMER MAY BE CHARGED
ONLY FOR THE KILOWATT–HOURS OF ELECTRICITY DISPENSED DURING THE
CHARGING SESSION.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1 EACH YEAR, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DETERMINE THE MINIMUM PRICE FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A
VEHICLE FUEL.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL PUBLISH THE MINIMUM PRICE
DETERMINED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION ON THE COMPTROLLER’S WEBSITE.
(D) (C) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE PRICE CHARGED FOR THE RETAIL
SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A VEHICLE FUEL, THE OWNER OR POSSESSOR OF A WEIGHT
AND MEASURE USED FOR THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY AS A VEHICLE FUEL
MAY CHARGE A FEE FOR SERVICES RELATED TO THE RETAIL SALE OF ELECTRICITY
AS A VEHICLE FUEL.
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) MAY BE A FIXED FEE OR ASSESSED BASED ON LENGTH OF
TIME;
(II) MAY BE APPLIED ONLY AT THE CONCLUSION OF A
CHARGING SESSION; AND
(III) SHALL BE ITEMIZED ON THE CUSTOMER’S RECEIPT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 280
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 3 –